Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-280
Discontinuance or settlement.

(MBCA 7.45) A derivative
proceeding may not be discontinued or settled without the court's approval.
If the court determines that a proposed discontinuance or settlement will
substantially affect the interests of the corporation's shareholders or a
class of shareholders, the court shall direct that notice be given to the
shareholders affected.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 80.